North Dakota statutes. TITLE 58 Townships
CHAPTER 58-10 Constables [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1989 ch. 169, § 12, and by omission]

58-10-01.
Jurisdiction of township justices. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

58-10-02.
Proceedings before township justices. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

58-10-03.
General powers of constable — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 161, § 12.

58-10-04.
Powers of constables to arrest for disorderly conduct in a city. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 161, § 12.

58-10-05.
Person convicted of violating township bylaw confined in township jail. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 161, § 12.